Illinois, session 104th, HB5532.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 52-3.53a, 21A-5, 21A-10, 21A-15, 21A-20, 21A-25, and 21A-30 as 6follows: 7    (105 ILCS 5/2-3.53a)8    Sec. 2-3.53a. New principal mentoring program.9    (a) Beginning on July 1, 2007, and subject to an annual 10appropriation by the General Assembly, to establish a new 11principal mentoring program for new principals. Any individual 12who is first hired as a principal on or after July 1, 2007 13shall participate in a new principal mentoring program for the 14duration of his or her first year as a principal and must 15complete the program in accordance with the requirements 16established under this Section and by the State Board of 17Education by rule or, for a school district created by Article 1834 of this Code, in accordance with the provisions of Section 1934-18.33 34-18.27 of this Code. School districts created by 20Article 34 are not subject to the requirements of subsection 21(b), (c), (d), (e), (f), or (g), (i), (j), (k), (l), or (m) of 22this Section. Any individual who is first hired as a principal 23on or after July 1, 2008 may participate in a second year of   HB5532- 2 -LRB104 19441 LNS 32889 b1mentoring if it is determined by the State Superintendent of 2Education that sufficient funding exists for such 3participation. The new principal mentoring program shall match 4an experienced principal who meets the requirements of 5subsection (b) of this Section with each new principal in 6order to assist the new principal in the development of his or 7her professional growth and to provide guidance.8    (b) Any individual who has been a principal in Illinois 9for 3 or more years and who has demonstrated success as an 10instructional leader, as determined by the State Board by 11rule, is eligible to apply to be a mentor under a new principal 12mentoring program. Eligible mentors Mentors shall be selected 13by approved entities and shall complete mentoring training 14provided by an approved entity by entities approved by the 15State Board and meet any other requirements set forth by the 16State Board by rule and by the school district employing the 17mentor.18    (c) Subject to annual appropriation by the General 19Assembly, the State Board shall establish a competitive grant 20program to support the new principal mentoring program and 21shall approve one or more eligible entities to provide 22services to new principals under the program. Approval of 23eligible entities shall be valid for 3 years. Eligible 24entities are defined as regional offices of education, 25intermediate service centers, Illinois higher education 26institutions, statewide organizations representing   HB5532- 3 -LRB104 19441 LNS 32889 b1principals, and school districts. Approved entities shall be 2responsible for mentor training, pairing mentors and new 3principals, and all other administrative aspects of providing 4mentoring services as provided by the State Board by rule. The 5State Board shall certify an entity or entities approved to 6provide training of mentors.7    (d) A mentor shall be assigned to a new principal based on 8(i) similarity of grade level or type of school, (ii) learning 9needs of the new principal, and (iii) accessibility 10geographical proximity of the mentor to the new principal. The 11principal, in collaboration with the mentor, shall identify 12areas for improvement of the new principal's professional 13growth, including, but not limited to, professional growth in 14the areas addressed in the Illinois Performance Standards for 15School Leaders. each of the following:16        (1) Analyzing data and applying it to practice.17        (2) Aligning professional development and 18    instructional programs.19        (3) Building a professional learning community.20        (4) Observing classroom practices and providing 21    feedback.22        (5) Facilitating effective meetings.23        (6) Developing distributive leadership practices.24        (7) Facilitating organizational change.25The mentor shall not be required to provide input into a new 26principal's an evaluation that is completed in accordance with   HB5532- 4 -LRB104 19441 LNS 32889 b1Article 24A of this Code of the new principal on the basis of 2the mentoring relationship.3    (e) On or before July 1, 2008 and on or after July 1 of 4each year thereafter, the State Board shall facilitate a 5review and evaluate the new principal mentoring training 6program in collaboration with the approved entities providers. 7Each new principal and his or her mentor must complete a 8verification form developed by the State Board in order to 9certify their completion of a new principal mentoring program.10    (f) The requirements of this Section do not apply to any 11individual who has previously served as an assistant principal 12in Illinois acting under an administrative endorsement 13certificate for 5 or more years and who is hired, on or after 14July 1, 2007, as a principal by the school district in which 15the individual last served as an assistant principal, although 16such an individual may choose to participate in this program 17or may shall be required to participate in the program by the 18individual's employing school district.19    (g) The State Board may adopt any rules necessary for the 20implementation of this Section.21    (h) On an annual basis, the State Superintendent of 22Education shall determine whether appropriations are likely to 23be sufficient to require operation of the new principal 24mentoring program for the coming year. In doing so, the State 25Superintendent of Education shall first determine whether it 26is likely that funds will be sufficient to require operation   HB5532- 5 -LRB104 19441 LNS 32889 b1of the mentoring program for individuals in their first year 2as principal and shall then determine whether it is likely 3that funds will be sufficient to require operation of the 4mentoring program for individuals in their second year as 5principal.6    (i) If the State Superintendent of Education determines 7that appropriations are not likely sufficient to serve all 8anticipated first year principals in any given year, then the 9new principal mentoring program shall be voluntary and 10priority access to mentoring services shall be given to first 11year principals in the highest need schools, as determined by 12the State Superintendent of Education. The new principal 13mentoring program shall only be available to second year 14principals if the State Superintendent of Education first 15determines that appropriations are likely sufficient to serve 16all anticipated first year principals. If mentoring services 17are extended to second year principals and if appropriations 18are not sufficient to serve all second year principals who 19wish to participate in the new principal mentoring program, 20priority access to mentoring services shall be given to second 21year principals who are in the highest need schools, as 22determined by the State Superintendent of Education.23    (j) The State Superintendent of Education may determine on 24a yearly basis the number of mentoring hours required for 25first year principals and the number of mentoring hours 26required for second year principals.  HB5532- 6 -LRB104 19441 LNS 32889 b1    (k) The State Superintendent of Education may determine on 2a yearly basis the amount of compensation to be provided to 3first year principal mentors, second year principal mentors, 4and approved entities.5    (l) Contact hours for mentors and principals may be in 6person, by telephone, online, or by any other mechanism that 7allows for synchronous communication between the mentor and 8new principal. The State Board may, by rule, require a minimum 9number of in-person contact hours.10    (m) Using funds from the new principal mentoring program, 11the State Board may contract with an independent party to 12conduct a comprehensive evaluation of the program. 13(Source: P.A. 96-373, eff. 8-13-09; 102-521, eff. 8-20-21.) 14    (105 ILCS 5/21A-5)15    Sec. 21A-5. Definitions. In this Article:16    "New teacher" means the holder of a professional educator 17license, as set forth in Section 21B-20 of this Code, who is 18employed by a public school and who has not previously 19participated in a new teacher induction and mentoring program 20required by this Article, except as provided in Section 21A-25 21of this Code.22    "Eligible applicant" or "eligible entity" means a regional 23office of education, an intermediate service center, an 24Illinois institution of higher education, a statewide 25organization representing teachers, a local education agency,   HB5532- 7 -LRB104 19441 LNS 32889 b1or a public or private not-for-profit entity with experience 2providing professional learning, including mentoring, to early 3childhood educators. 4    "Public school" means any school operating pursuant to the 5authority of this Code, including without limitation a school 6district, a charter school, a cooperative or joint agreement 7with a governing body or board of control, and a school 8operated by a regional office of education or State agency.9(Source: P.A. 101-643, eff. 6-18-20; 102-521, eff. 8-20-21.) 10    (105 ILCS 5/21A-10)11    Sec. 21A-10. Development of program required. 12    (a) Each eligible applicant shall develop a new teacher 13induction and mentoring program for first and second-year 14teachers that meets the requirements set forth in Section 1521A-20 to assist new teachers in developing the skills and 16strategies necessary for instructional excellence, provided 17that funding is made available by the State Board of Education 18from an appropriation made for this purpose.19    (b) A public school that has a new teacher induction and 20mentoring program in existence before the effective date of 21this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly that does 22not meet the requirements set forth in Section 21A-20 may 23modify the program to meet the requirements of Section 21A-20 24and may receive funding as described in Section 21A-25, 25provided that funding is made available by the State Board of   HB5532- 8 -LRB104 19441 LNS 32889 b1Education from an appropriation made for this purpose.2    (c) Each school district shall decide, in conjunction with 3its exclusive bargaining representative, if any, whether to 4forgo modifications to a new teacher induction and mentoring 5program in existence before the effective date of this 6amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly.7    If a district does not have a new teacher induction and 8mentoring program in existence before the effective date of 9this amendatory Act of the 102nd General Assembly or if a 10district and the exclusive bargaining representative, if any, 11agree that an eligible entity would better serve the 12district's needs, the district and the exclusive bargaining 13representative, if any, shall jointly decide which eligible 14entity offers the most suitable program. The eligible entity 15shall include representatives from both the district and the 16exclusive bargaining representative in the program development 17discussions to ensure the program captures local need. 18During the 2003-2004 school year, each public school or 2 or 19more public schools acting jointly shall develop, in 20conjunction with its exclusive representative or their 21exclusive representatives, if any, a new teacher induction and 22mentoring program that meets the requirements set forth in 23Section 21A-20 of this Code to assist new teachers in 24developing the skills and strategies necessary for 25instructional excellence, provided that funding is made 26available by the State Board of Education from an   HB5532- 9 -LRB104 19441 LNS 32889 b1appropriation made for this purpose. A public school that has 2an existing induction and mentoring program that does not meet 3the requirements set forth in Section 21A-20 of this Code may 4have school years 2003-2004 and 2004-2005 to develop a program 5that does meet those requirements and may receive funding as 6described in Section 21A-25 of this Code, provided that the 7funding is made available by the State Board of Education from 8an appropriation made for this purpose. A public school with 9such an existing induction and mentoring program may receive 10funding for the 2005-2006 school year for each new teacher in 11the second year of a 2-year program that does not meet the 12requirements set forth in Section 21A-20, as long as the 13public school has established the required new program by the 14beginning of that school year as described in Section 21A-15 15and provided that funding is made available by the State Board 16of Education from an appropriation made for this purpose as 17described in Section 21A-25.18(Source: P.A. 93-355, eff. 1-1-04; 102-521, eff. 8-20-21.) 19    (105 ILCS 5/21A-15)20    Sec. 21A-15. Program establishment and implementation. 21When program is to be established and implemented. 22    (a) The State Board of Education shall establish a 23competitive State grant program to support new teacher 24induction and mentoring programs. The program shall be 25available to eligible entities not less than every 3 years,   HB5532- 10 -LRB104 19441 LNS 32889 b1subject to appropriation. The State Board shall prioritize 2funding based on the needs of students and school districts as 3it relates to teacher retention.4    (b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this Code, by 5no later than the beginning of the 2022-2023 school year or by 6no later than the beginning of the 2023-2024 school year for 7eligible applicants that have been given an extension of time 8to develop a program under Section 21A-10, each eligible 9entity or 2 or more eligible entities acting jointly shall 10establish and implement a new teacher induction and mentoring 11program required to be developed under Section 21A-10. 12Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Code, by the 13beginning of the 2004-2005 school year (or by the beginning of 14the 2005-2006 school year for a public school that has been 15given an extension of time to develop a program under Section 1621A-10 of this Code), each public school or 2 or more public 17schools acting jointly shall establish and implement, in 18conjunction with its exclusive representative or their 19exclusive representatives, if any, the new teacher induction 20and mentoring program required to be developed under Section 2121A-10 of this Code, provided that funding is made available 22by the State Board of Education, from an appropriation made 23for this purpose, as described in Section 21A-25 of this Code. 24A public school may contract with an institution of higher 25education or other independent party to assist in implementing 26the program.  HB5532- 11 -LRB104 19441 LNS 32889 b1(Source: P.A. 93-355, eff. 1-1-04; 102-521, eff. 8-20-21.) 2    (105 ILCS 5/21A-20)3    Sec. 21A-20. Program requirements. Each new teacher 4induction and mentoring program must align with the standards 5established under Section 21A-20.5 and shall be based on a 6plan that at least does all of the following: 7        (1) Assigns a mentor teacher to each new teacher for a 8    period of at least 2 school years. 9        (2) Aligns with the Illinois Culturally Responsive 10    Teaching and Leading Standards in Part 24 of Title 23 of 11    the Illinois Administrative Code Illinois Professional 12    Teaching Standards, content area standards, and applicable 13    local school improvement and professional development 14    plans, if any. 15        (3) (Blank). Addresses all of the following elements 16    and how they will be provided: 17            (A) Mentoring and support of the new teacher. 18            (B) Professional development specifically designed 19        to ensure the growth of the new teacher's knowledge 20        and skills. 21            (C) Formative assessment designed to ensure 22        feedback and reflection, which must not be used in any 23        evaluation of the new teacher. 24        (4) Describes the role of mentor teachers, the 25    criteria and process for their selection, and how they   HB5532- 12 -LRB104 19441 LNS 32889 b1    will be trained, provided that each mentor teacher shall 2    demonstrate the best practices in teaching his or her 3    respective field of practice. A mentor teacher may not 4    directly or indirectly participate in the evaluation of a 5    new teacher pursuant to Article 24A of this Code or the 6    evaluation procedure of the public school.7        (5) Is designed to be available for both in-person and 8    virtual participation. 9(Source: P.A. 93-355, eff. 1-1-04; 102-521, eff. 8-20-21.) 10    (105 ILCS 5/21A-25)11    Sec. 21A-25. Funding. 12    (a) From a separate appropriation made for the purposes of 13this Article, for each new teacher participating in a new 14teacher induction and mentoring program that meets the 15requirements set forth in Section 21A-20 of this Code or in an 16existing program that is in the process of transition to a 17program that meets those requirements, the State Board of 18Education shall pay the eligible entity for the duration of 19the grant public school $1,200 annually for each of 2 school 20years for the purpose of providing one or more of the 21following: 22        (1) Mentor teacher compensation and new teacher 23    compensation. 24        (2) Mentor teacher professional learning training or 25    new teacher learning training or both.   HB5532- 13 -LRB104 19441 LNS 32889 b1        (3) (Blank). Release time.2    (b) Each school district shall decide, in conjunction with 3its exclusive bargaining representative, if any, which 4eligible applicant offers the most suitable program. If a 5mentor teacher receives release time to support a new teacher, 6the total workload of other teachers regularly employed by the 7public school shall not increase in any substantial manner. If 8the appropriation is not included in the State budget, the 9State Board of Education is not required to implement programs 10established by this Article. 11However, if a new teacher, after participating in the new 12teacher induction and mentoring program for one school year, 13becomes employed by another public school, the State Board of 14Education shall pay the teacher's new school $1,200 for the 15second school year and the teacher shall continue to be a new 16teacher as defined in this Article. Each public school shall 17determine, in conjunction with its exclusive representative, 18if any, how the $1,200 per school year for each new teacher 19shall be used, provided that if a mentor teacher receives 20additional release time to support a new teacher, the total 21workload of other teachers regularly employed by the public 22school shall not increase in any substantial manner. If the 23appropriation is insufficient to cover the $1,200 per school 24year for each new teacher, public schools are not required to 25develop or implement the program established by this Article. 26In the event of an insufficient appropriation, a public school   HB5532- 14 -LRB104 19441 LNS 32889 b1or 2 or more schools acting jointly may submit an application 2for a grant administered by the State Board of Education and 3awarded on a competitive basis to establish a new teacher 4induction and mentoring program that meets the criteria set 5forth in Section 21A-20 of this Code. The State Board of 6Education may retain up to $1,000,000 of the appropriation for 7new teacher induction and mentoring programs to train mentor 8teachers, administrators, and other personnel, to provide best 9practices information, and to conduct an evaluation of these 10programs' impact and effectiveness.11(Source: P.A. 93-355, eff. 1-1-04; 102-521, eff. 8-20-21.) 12    (105 ILCS 5/21A-30)13    Sec. 21A-30. Evaluation of programs. The State Board of 14Education shall contract with an independent party, using 15funds from the relevant appropriation for new teacher 16induction and mentoring programs, to conduct a comprehensive 17evaluation of the new teacher induction and mentoring programs 18established pursuant to this Article. Reports from the 19evaluation shall be made available to stakeholders after 3 20years of program implementation. The State Board of Education 21and the State Educator Preparation and Licensure Board shall 22jointly contract with an independent party to conduct a 23comprehensive evaluation of new teacher induction and 24mentoring programs established pursuant to this Article. The 25first report of this evaluation shall be presented to the   HB5532- 15 -LRB104 19441 LNS 32889 b1General Assembly on or before January 1, 2009. Subsequent 2evaluations shall be conducted and reports presented to the 3General Assembly on or before January 1 of every third year 4thereafter.5(Source: P.A. 101-643, eff. 6-18-20; 102-521, eff. 8-20-21.) 6    (105 ILCS 5/21A-20.5 rep.)7    (105 ILCS 5/21A-25.5 rep.)8    Section 10. The School Code is amended by repealing 9Sections 21A-20.5 and 21A-25.5.